District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.42

License renewal.

The Board of Medicine shall renew the license of a surgical assistant who, in addition to meeting the requirements of § 3-1205.04(q), has submitted to the Board, along with the application for renewal, documentation of current certification as a surgical assistant by:

(1)

The National Surgical Assistant Association;

(2)

The American Board of Surgical Assistants; or

(3)

The National Board of Surgical Technology and Surgical Assisting.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 642
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-228, § 2(i), 53 DCR 10244
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(f), 56 DCR 4043
D.C. Law 18-26, in par. (1), deleted “or” from the end; in par. (2), substituted “; or” for a period at the end; and added par. (3).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).